Utah statutes.
13-32a-110.   Civil penalties.

(1)  A violation of any of the following sections is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500:

(a)  Section 13-32a-104, register required to be maintained;

(b)  Section 13-32a-106, transaction information provided to law enforcement;

(c)  Section 13-32a-108, retention of records;

(d)  Section 13-32a-109, holding period for pawned articles;

(e)  Section 13-32a-111, payment of fees as required; or

(f)  Section 13-32a-112, training requirements for pawn, secondhand, and coin dealer business employees and officers of participating law enforcement agencies.

(2)  This section does not prohibit civil action by a governmental entity regarding the pawnbroker's business operation or licenses.

(3)  The imposition of civil penalties under this section does not prohibit criminal prosecution by a governmental entity for criminal violations of this chapter.

